eng.lexc
LEXICON Root

Verb ;
Noun ;
Prefix ;

LEXICON Prefix

[ANTI]:anti	    Noun;
[PROTO]:proto   Noun;
[PSEUDO]:pseudo Noun;

LEXICON Noun

cat    NInfl;
dog    NInfl;
horse  NInfl;
mouse  NInfl;
mouse[N][Plural]:mice #;
fish   NInfl;
bus    NInfl;
fox    NInfl;

LEXICON Verb

run	   VInfl;
walk   VInfl;
try    VInfl;
bus[V][3pSgPres]:busses #;
run[N][Singular]:runner #;
run[N][Plural]:runners #;
run[V][Past]:ran #;
try[V][Past]:tried #;

LEXICON NInfl

[N][Singular]:0 #;
[N][Plural]:+s  #;

LEXICON VInfl

[V][Infinitive]:0 #;
[V][3pSgPres]:+s #;
[V][Past]:+ed #;
[N][Singular]:+er #;
[N][Plural]:+ers #;
